Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6365.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 413. Whether or not notes or corporation obligations issued pursuant to under this act are of such the form or character as to be negotiable instruments under the uniform commercial code, Act No. 174 of the Public Acts of 1962, being sections 440.1101 to 440.11102 of the Michigan Compiled Laws, 1962 PA 174, MCL 440.1101 to 440.12501, the notes and corporation obligations authorized to be issued under this act are negotiable instruments, within the meaning of and for all purposes of the uniform commercial code, Act No. 174 of the Public Acts of 1962, 1962 PA 174, MCL 440.1101 to 440.12501, subject only to the provisions of the notes or corporation obligations for registration. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 6347 (request no. H02809'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.